California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(e) Obtains an annual permit to serve alcoholic beverages at events and obtains an authorization for each event, as specified in Section 23399.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24045.12 (as amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 639) by Stats. 2007, Ch. 349, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

24045.18.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a beer and wine wholesaler that also holds an off-sale beer and wine retail license and only sells wine or the holder of a limited off-sale retail wine license may assist a nonprofit organization holding a temporary wine license in conducting a winetasting. The privilege granted under this section for a beer and wine wholesaler that also holds an off-sale beer and wine retail license and only sells wine or the holder of a limited off-sale retail wine license shall apply only to wine produced for the donating licensee that is labeled with a brand owned exclusively by the donating licensee and shall include in the tasting only wine donated by the licensee to the event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 292, Sec. 3.   (AB 623)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24045.19.

(a) The department may issue a special temporary on-sale wine license to a nonprofit corporation, exempt from payment of income taxes under Section 23701a or 23701e of the Revenue and Taxation Code and Section 501(c)(5) or 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, if a majority of whose members are either licensed winegrowers, winegrape growers, or professionals in the fields of enology or viticulture. The license shall authorize the sale of wine for consumption on the premises where sold, and no off-sale privileges shall be exercised under this license. An applicant for this license shall accompany the application with a fee equal to the actual cost of issuing the license, but not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75) per day.

(b) This special license shall only entitle the licensee to sell to the general public wine bought by, or donated to, the licensee under either of the following conditions:

(1) The wine is sold as part of a class, seminar, or other instructional event organized by the licensee to educate the general public on topics related to enology or viticulture. The instruction may include, without limitation, the history, nature, values, and characteristics of the wines and grapes that were used to make the wines. A single tasting of wine shall not exceed one ounce. The licensee shall remove any wine not consumed during the instruction that the licensee provided following the instruction.

(2) The wine is sold at a winetasting event organized by the licensee to educate and instruct the general public with respect to the uses and value of winegrapes from a particular agricultural region that is related to the licensee’s exempt purpose. A single tasting of wine shall not exceed one ounce. If the licensee’s name, or any name under which the licensee does business, includes the designation of an American appellation of origin, as defined in Section 4.25 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the wines sold by the licensee pursuant to this license shall be labeled with the named appellation of origin, or an appellation of origin located entirely within the named appellation of origin. The licensee shall remove any wine not consumed during the winetasting event that the licensee provided following the winetasting event.

(c) A class, seminar, instructional event, or winetasting event organized pursuant to this section shall not be directed toward a specific private brand or trade name, although private brands and trade names may be used at the events.

(d) Only six special licenses authorized by this section shall be issued to any single nonprofit corporation in any one calendar year. The special license shall be for a period not to exceed two consecutive days.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, licensees may donate wine or sell wine to a nonprofit corporation that obtains a special temporary on-sale license under this section, provided the donation is not made in connection with a sale of an alcoholic beverage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 441, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

24046.

Upon receipt of any license, the licensee shall post it in a conspicuous place upon the licensed premises. Licenses issued for trains, boats or airplanes may, in lieu of being posted upon the train, boat, or airplane for which issued, be posted in such other place in this State as the department shall designate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1529.)
-------------------------------------------

24047.

Whenever a license certificate is in effect and is lost or destroyed, the department shall issue a duplicate license upon the payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 60.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24048.

Every license, other than a temporary license or a daily on-sale general license issued pursuant to Section 24045.1, is renewable unless the license has been revoked if the renewal application is made and the fee therefor is paid. All licenses expire at 12 midnight on the last day of the month posted on the license. All licenses issued shall be renewed as follows:

(a) On or before the first of the month preceding the month posted on the license, the department shall mail to each licensee at their licensed premises, or at any other email or postal address that the licensee has designated,
 an application to renew the license.

(b) The application to renew the license may be filed before the license expires upon payment of the annual fee as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 23320.

(c) For 60 days after the license expires, the license may be renewed upon payment of the annual renewal fee as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 23320, plus a penalty fee that shall be equal to 50 percent of the annual fee.

(d) Unless otherwise terminated, or unless renewed pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of this section, a license that is in effect on the month posted on the license continues in effect through 2 a.m. of the 60th day following the month posted on the license, at which time it is automatically canceled.

(e) On or before the 10th day
 preceding the cancellation of a license, the department shall send a notice of cancellation to each licensee who has not either filed an application to renew their license or notified the department of their intent not to do so. Failure to send the renewal application in accordance with subdivision (a) or to send the notice provided in this subdivision shall not continue the right to a license.

(f) A license that has been canceled pursuant to subdivision (d) of this section may be reinstated during the 30 days immediately following cancellation upon payment of the annual renewal fee as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 23320, plus a penalty fee that shall be equal to 100 percent of the annual fee. Payment shall be made by cashier’s check, money order, or electronically using any payment method authorized through the department’s online payment portal. A license that has been canceled pursuant to subdivision (d) of this section and that has not been reinstated within 30 days pursuant to this subdivision is automatically revoked on the 31st day after the license has been canceled.

(g) A renewal application shall not be deemed filed within the meaning of this section unless the document itself has been actually delivered to, and the required renewal fee has been paid at, any office of the department during office hours, or unless both the document and fee have been filed and remitted pursuant to Section 11003 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 136, Sec. 3.   (SB 1011)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

24049.

The department may refuse to transfer any license when the applicant is delinquent in the payment of any taxes due under the Alcoholic Beverage Tax Law, the Sales and Use Tax Law, the Personal Income Tax Law, or the Bank and Corporation Tax Law, or on unsecured property as defined in Section 134 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, when such tax liability arises in full or in part out of the exercise of the privilege of an alcoholic beverage license, or any amount due under the Unemployment Insurance Code when such liability arises out of the conduct of a business licensed by the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1034.)
-------------------------------------------

24049.5.

(a) The State Board of Equalization or the Franchise Tax Board may seize and sell the license of an off-sale or on-sale general licensee that, upon termination of business, is delinquent in the payment of taxes due under the Sales and Use Tax Law, Personal Income Tax Law, or Corporation Tax Law, respectively. In order for a seizure and sale of a license to be accomplished under this section, the licensee shall have either surrendered the license to the department or failed to pay the annual renewal fee to the department. Immediately upon seizure the State Board of Equalization or Franchise Tax Board shall give written notice by first-class mail to the department and to the licensee of the seizure and of the intention of the board to sell the license. The seizure and sale shall be in accordance with the provisions of Article 6
 (commencing with Section 6796) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or Article 4 (commencing with Section 19251) of Chapter 5 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, respectively, and with the provisions of this division. Nothing within these provisions shall be construed to permit the State Board of Equalization or Franchise Tax Board to sell alcoholic beverages.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “termination of business” means the licensee has ceased business operations and has either surrendered the license to the department or the license has expired pursuant to Section 24048.

(c) The licensee may redeem the license at any time before the date of sale of the license by the board or the appropriate reinstatement deadline, whichever occurs first, by conforming to the requirements for reinstatement of a license pursuant to
 subdivision (f) of Section 24048.

The person who purchases the license at the sale may reinstate the license by paying the applicable fees, but the transfer shall be effective only on approval of the department after the purchaser has complied with the requirements for transfer provided in this division.

(d) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 699.720 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall not be construed to limit the authority of the State Board of Equalization or the Franchise Tax Board to seize and sell licenses pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 3264)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24051.

The department may issue and renew on-sale beer licenses for fishing party boats on payment of the fees without regard to the provisions of Sections 23985, 23986, 23987, 23988, 24013, 24014, or 24043.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24052 by Stats. 1961, Ch. 73.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transfer of Licenses [24070. - 24082.]

24070.

Each license is separate and distinct and is transferable upon approval by the department from the licensee to another person and from one premises to another premises.

(a) All off-sale general licenses may be transferred from one county to another county, subject to the following provisions:

(1) The number of off-sale general licenses in existence in any county on June 1 of any year shall not be increased by more than 25 new original off-sale general licenses during the following 12-month period, provided further that the number of new original off-sale general licenses that may be issued in any county during any 12-month period shall not increase by more than 10 percent the number of off-sale general licenses in existence
 in that county on the June 1 with which that 12-month period began.

(2) After the department computes the number of new original off-sale licenses that may be issued in any county during any 12-month period as provided by the foregoing paragraph, if the department determines that the ratio established by Section 23817 will permit, during that 12-month period, additional off-sale general licenses in any county, off-sale general licenses may be transferred into that county in a number not to exceed by more than 10 percent the number of off-sale general licenses in existence in that county on the June 1 with which that 12-month period began, but in no event to exceed 25 such transfers during that 12-month period.

(3) Under no circumstances shall the combined total number of new original off-sale general licenses that may be issued in any county during any 12-month period and the
 number of off-sale general licenses that may be transferred into such county during that 12-month period, exceed the limitation set forth in Section 23817.

(b) All on-sale general licenses may be transferred from one county to another county, subject to the following provisions:

(1) The number of on-sale general licenses in existence in any county on June 1 of any year shall not be increased by more than 10 percent by the issuance of new original on-sale general licenses, but in no event to exceed 25 such licenses, during any 12-month period. The number of on-sale general licenses shall be limited by the provisions of Section 23816.

(2) After the department computes the number of new original on-sale licenses that may be issued in any county during any 12-month period as provided by the foregoing paragraph, if the
 department determines that the ratio established by Section 23816 will permit, during that 12-month period, additional on-sale general licenses in any county, on-sale general licenses may be transferred into that county in a number not to exceed by more than 10 percent the number of on-sale general licenses in existence in that county on June 1 with which that 12-month period began, but in no event to exceed 25 such transfers during that 12-month period.

(3) Under no circumstances shall the combined total number of new original on-sale general licenses that may be issued in any county during any 12-month period and the number of on-sale general licenses that may be transferred into that county during that 12-month period, exceed the limitation set forth in Section 23816.

(c) No retail license subject to the provisions of Section 23816 or 23817 issued as a new original license on
 or after June 1, 1961, and no off-sale general license or on-sale general license transferred from one county to another county on or after August 17, 1967, shall be transferable from the licensee to another person, or if the licensee is a corporation a controlling interest in the stock ownership of the licensee shall not be, directly or indirectly, sold, transferred, or hypothecated unless the licensee be a corporation the stock of which is listed on a stock exchange in this state or in the City of New York, State of New York, or which is required by law to file periodic reports with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, for a period of two years from date of issuance of the license, except as provided in Section 24071, and except when the department determines that the transfer is necessary to prevent undue hardship.

(d) (1) An on-sale general license or off-sale general license that has been transferred
 from one county to another county shall not be transferred for a purchase price or consideration in excess of the original fee paid for that license pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision(a) of Section 23320 for a period of five years following the previous transfer of that license.

(2) An on-sale general license or off-sale general license that has been transferred from one county to another county may be transferred with no restrictions as to the purchase price or consideration to the transferor or from the transferee after a period of five years from the date of the previous intercounty transfer of the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 62.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24070.1.

An on-sale license issued for a bona fide public eating place may be transferred from the licensee to another person, as provided in Section 24070, for a bona fide public eating place or for public premises, as defined in Section 23039. An on-sale license issued for public premises may be transferred from the licensee to another person, as provided in Section 24070, for public premises or for a bona fide public eating place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1779.)
-------------------------------------------

24070.2.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 24070, any off-sale general license issued prior to April 29, 1992, and located within the boundaries of the United States Bureau of the Census census tracts 234000, 234200, 234300, 234500, 234600, 234700, 234800, 234900, 235100, 235201, 235202, 236100, 236201, 236202, 236400, 231100, 231500, 231600, 231700, 231800, 231900, 232100, 232200, 232300, 232400, 232500, 232600, 232700, 232800, 237100, 237200, 237300, 237400, 237500, 237600, 237700, 237800, 237900, 238000, 238100, 238200, 238300, 238400, 240300, 240400, 241200, 241300, 600100, 600201, 600202, 600301, 600302, 600400, 602700, 602800, 602900, 603002, 228100, 228200, 228300, 228400, 228500, 228600, 228700, 228800, 228900, 229100, 229200, 229300, 229400, 239200, 239300, 239500, 239600, 239700, 239800, 242000, 242100, 242200, 242300, 242600, 242700, 243000, 243100, 535400, 240000, 240200, 240500, 240600, 240700, 240800, 240900, 241000, 241100, 241400, 532700, 532800, 532900, 533000, 534900, 535000, 535101, 535102, 535200, 535300, 535400, 541100, 541200, 541300, 541400, 541601, 541602, 541800, 542000, 542101, 542102, 542200, 542401, 542402, 542500, 542600, 542700, 542800, 542900, 543000, 543100, 543200, 543301, 543321, and 570400 located within Los Angeles County may be transferred from that county to another county without regard to the limitations imposed by Section 24070. Notwithstanding the fee provisions of Section 24072, the fee for a transfer of a license pursuant to this section shall be one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1285, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24070.5.

When a winegrower has failed to carry on business actively, pursuant to a winegrower’s license, for a period of one year, such winegrower’s license, without regard to when it was originally issued, may be transferred only to a person who qualifies as a winegrower, as defined in Sections 23013 and 23358 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1277.)
-------------------------------------------

24071.

(a) The license of one spouse may be transferred to the other spouse when the application for transfer is made prior to the entry of a final decree of divorce, and the license of a decedent, minor ward, incompetent person, conservatee, debtor in a bankruptcy case, person for whose estate a receiver is appointed, or assignor for the benefit of creditors may be transferred by or to the surviving partners of a deceased licensee, the executor, administrator, conservator or guardian of an estate of a licensee, the surviving spouse of a deceased licensee in the event that the deceased licensee leaves no estate to be administered, the trustee of a bankrupt estate of a licensee, a receiver of the estate of a licensee, or an assignee for the benefit of creditors of a licensee with the consent of the assignor, or a license may be
 transferred by or to a receiver appointed for a judgment debtor as provided by Section 708.630 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or a license may be transferred to a revocable living trust when the licensee is also the trustee, and the fee for the transfer of each license shall be one hundred dollars ($100). A license may be transferred between partners where no new partner is being licensed, or a license may be transferred between corporations whose outstanding shares of stock are owned by the same natural persons, or a licensee may transfer upon compliance with Section 24073 any license to a corporation whose entire stock is owned by the licensee, or their spouse, or a licensee may transfer upon compliance with Section 24073 any license to a limited liability company whose entire membership consists of the licensee, or their spouse, or a license may be transferred from a corporation to a person who owns, or whose spouse owns, the entire stock of the corporation, and the fee for transfer of each license is
 one hundred fifteen dollars ($115). The regular transfer fee provided in Section 24072 shall be due and payable upon the subsequent transfer of 25 percent of the stock in a corporation to which a license has been transferred by a licensee or their spouse pursuant to this section, except if the transfer of stock is from a parent to their child or grandchild, in which case the fee shall be one-half of the regular transfer fee. In no case shall a fee be charged for the transfer of an importer’s license. All money collected from the fees provided for in this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(b) The fees may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to authorize the formation of a limited liability company composed of only one member in
 violation of subdivision (b) of Section 17050 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 63.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24071.1.

(a) (1) When the ownership of 50 percent or more of the shares of stock of a corporation, which is required to report the issuance or transfer of those shares of stock under Section 23405, is acquired by or transferred to a person or persons who did not hold the ownership of 50 percent of those shares of stock on the date the license was issued to the corporation, the license of the corporation shall be transferred to the corporation as newly constituted. When there is a new general partner or when the ownership of 50 percent or more of the capital or profits of a limited partnership, which is required to maintain a register under Section 23405.1, is acquired by or transferred to a person or persons as general or limited partners and who did not hold ownership of 50
 percent or more of the capital or profits of the limited partnership on the date the license was issued to the limited partnership, the license of the limited partnership shall be transferred to the limited partnership as newly constituted. The application fee for the transfer of an on-sale general license or an off-sale general license shall be eight hundred dollars ($800). For all other licenses, the fee shall be three hundred thirty-five dollars ($335). In situations involving the multiple and simultaneous transfer of licenses under this section, the regular transfer fee shall only be required for one of the licenses being transferred and the remainder of the licenses shall be transferred for a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) each. All of the transfer fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761. Before the license is transferred, the department shall conduct an investigation pursuant to the provisions of Section 23958. Any
 person or persons who own 50 percent or more of the shares of stock of the corporation or who own as limited partners 50 percent or more of the capital or profits of the limited partnership, as the case may be, shall have all the qualifications required of a person holding the same type of license.

(2) The fees may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320.

(b) A retail license shall not be transferred by a corporation or a limited partnership under this section unless, before the filing of the transfer application with the department, the corporation or limited partnership initiating the transfer records in the office of the county recorder of the county or counties in which the premises to which the license has been issued are situated a notice of the intended transfer, stating all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the corporation or limited partnership.

(2) The name and address of the person or persons acquiring ownership of 50 percent or more of the stock of the corporation or capital or profits of the limited partnership.

(3) The amount of the consideration paid for the stock or limited partnership interests.

(4) The kind of license or licenses intended to be transferred.

(5) The address or addresses of the premises to which the license or licenses have been issued.

(c) A copy of the notice of the intended transfer, certified by the county recorder, shall be filed with the department together with the
 transfer application.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a corporation or limited partnership as newly constituted by transfer under this section, is not eligible for any new credit from any person named in Section 25509 until all delinquent payments owed by the entity as formerly constituted, are made, nor shall any entity retail licensee, by transferring its license under this section, avoid the provisions of Section 25509 with regard to 42-day or 30-day periods, percentage charges for unpaid balances, or cash-on-delivery basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 64.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24071.2.

(a) (1) When the ownership of 50 percent or more of the membership interests in a limited liability company required to report the issuance or transfer of memberships under Section 23405.2 is acquired by or transferred to a person or persons who did not hold the ownership of 50 percent of the membership interests on the date the license was issued to the limited liability company, the license of the limited liability company shall be transferred to the limited liability company as newly constituted. The application fee for the transfer of an on-sale general license or an off-sale general license shall be eight hundred dollars ($800). For all other licenses, the fee shall be three hundred thirty-five dollars ($335). In situations involving the multiple and
 simultaneous transfer of licenses under this section, the regular transfer fee shall be required for only one of the licenses being transferred and the remainder of the licenses shall be transferred for a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) each. All of the transfer fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund, as provided in Section 25761. Before the license is transferred, the department shall conduct an investigation pursuant to Section 23958. Any person or persons who own 50 percent or more of the membership interests of the limited liability company shall have all the qualifications required of a person holding the same type of license.

(2) The fees may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320.

(b) A retail license shall not be transferred by a limited liability company under this
 section unless, before the filing of the transfer application with the department, the company initiating the transfer records, in the office of the county recorder of the county or counties in which the premises to which the license has been issued are situated, a notice of the intended transfer, stating all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the limited liability company.

(2) The name and address of the person or persons acquiring ownership of 50 percent or more of the membership interests of the limited liability company.

(3) The amount of the consideration paid for the membership interests.

(4) The kind of license or licenses intended to be transferred.

(5) The address or
 addresses of the premises to which the license or licenses have been issued.

(c) A copy of the notice of the intended transfer, certified by the county recorder, shall be filed with the department together with the transfer application.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a limited liability company as newly constituted by transfer under this section shall not be eligible for any new credit from any person named in Section 25509 until all delinquent payments owed by the limited liability company as formerly constituted are made, nor shall any retail licensee, by transferring its license under this section, avoid the provisions of Section 25509 with regard to 42-day or 30-day periods, percentage charges for unpaid balances, or cash-on-delivery basis.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to
 authorize the formation of a limited liability company composed of only one member in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 17050 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 65.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24072.

(a) Except as provided in Section 24071, the following transfer fees shall be charged by the department:

(1) The application fee for a transfer of an on-sale general license or an off-sale general license from a licensee to another person or from a licensee to another person and premises is one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250).

(2) The application fee for a transfer of all other licenses from a licensee to another person is three hundred thirty-five dollars ($335). The application fee for a transfer from a licensee to another person and premises is equal to the application fee specified in paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 23320.

(3) Except as provided in Section 24082, the application fee for a transfer of a license, and any additional license held at specific premises, from one premises to another premises is seven hundred eighty dollars ($780).

(4) Notwithstanding the other fee provisions of this section, the application fee for a transfer of an on-sale or an off-sale general license from one county to another county shall be six thousand dollars ($6,000).

(5) The application fee for a transfer of an on-sale or off-sale retail license to include the parent or child of a licensee, when no consideration is given for the transfer, shall be one-half the regular fee for a transfer of a license from a licensee to
 another person, as provided by this section.

(b) If the application for a transfer made pursuant to subdivision (a) includes multiple licenses issued at the same premises, the application fee shall be required for only one of the licenses being transferred and the remainder of the licenses shall be transferred at no cost. In situations involving different license types, the application fee to be paid shall be the highest fee as specified in subdivision (a). If the application for a transfer made pursuant to subdivision (a) is combined with an application for a new permanent license pursuant to Section 23320 at the same premises, only the transfer application fee or the new permanent license application fee shall be required, whichever is highest. Notwithstanding this provision, the annual fee shall be payable for each license transferred
 pursuant to subdivision (c) and for each new permanent license issued pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 23320.

(c) In addition to the application fee, an applicant shall pay an annual fee for each of the licenses included in a transfer application made pursuant to this section.

(d) The department may charge a fee for the reactivation of any license following its surrender or abandonment for cases pursuant to regulations of the department.

(e) (1) The fee for the application to make material or substantial physical changes to the licensed premises or to the character of the licensed premises shall be three hundred forty-five dollars ($345), except when the application involves an expansion of
 the licensed premises, in which case the fee shall be three hundred eighty dollars ($380).

(2) If the department approves the application, with or without conditions, notwithstanding that a written objection to the change to the premises has been submitted to the department in the course of its investigation, the department shall treat that written objection in the same manner as a verified protest pursuant to Section 24015, and the person objecting to the change to the premises shall have the same right to request a hearing as specified for verified protests in that section.

(3) In its discretion, the department may require that the licensee proceed by way of a transfer of the license from one premises to another premises. In such circumstances, if the licensee has paid the
 application fee pursuant to this subdivision, the payment shall be credited to the fee required to be paid pursuant to subdivision (a).

(f) The fee for the submission of the report required by Section 23405, 23405.1, 23405.2, or 23405.3 is three hundred dollars ($300). If the department determines that a transfer of the license pursuant to Section 24071.1 or 24071.2 is necessary based upon the submitted report, the fee paid pursuant to this subdivision shall be credited toward the license transfer fee. The report fee of three hundred dollars ($300) shall not be required for duplicate licenses issued to branch office locations pursuant to Section 23389 or Section 23390 or for club licenses or veterans’ club licenses issued to nonprofit or fraternal organizations pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 23425) or Article 5 (commencing with Section
 23450) of Chapter 3.

(g) Any applicant whose application under this section is denied or withdrawn is entitled to a refund, if any, in the same manner as may be applicable to a license application denial or withdrawal as specified in Section 23320.

(h) The fees may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320. All money collected from the fees provided for this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 296, Sec. 4.   (AB 2971)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

24072.1.

An on-sale license issued for a bona fide public eating place may be transferred from the premises for which issued to other premises, as provided in Section 24072, for a bona fide public eating place or for public premises, as defined in Section 23039. An on-sale license issued for public premises may be transferred from the premises for which issued to other premises, as provided in Section 24072, for public premises or for a bona fide public eating place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1779.)
-------------------------------------------

24072.2.

Any person who has an on-sale license issued for a bona fide public eating place may exchange their license for a similar license for public premises, as defined in Section 23039, and any person who has such a license issued for public premises may exchange their license for a similar license for a bona fide public eating place. The exchange may be made at the time of renewal of the license sought to be exchanged, and not more than once between renewal periods, upon the approval of the department, the payment of an exchange fee of one hundred dollars ($100), and compliance with the provisions of this division relating to the issuance of an original license. The fee may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320. All money collected from the fee provided for in this
 section shall be deposited directly in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 68.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

24072.3.

(a) (1) Any person that has a brewpub-restaurant license may exchange that license for a bona fide public eating place license, as defined in Section 23038. The exchange may be made at any time upon the approval of the department, the payment of an exchange fee of one hundred dollars ($100), and compliance with the provisions of this division relating to the issuance of an original license.

(2) This section shall only apply to a brewpub-restaurant license that was first issued on or before December 31, 2019. For purposes of this paragraph, “first issued” means the date that the original brewpub-restaurant license was issued by the department, regardless of subsequent transfers thereof.

(b) (1) The fee established in subdivision (a) may be adjusted by the department pursuant to subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 23320.

(2) A person that exchanges a license pursuant to this section shall be required to pay the fee required for a new permanent license as set forth in Section 23320 for an on-sale general eating place.

(3) All money collected from the fee provided for in this section shall be deposited directly in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(c) (1) The department may designate a license issued pursuant to this section as an on-sale general license for special use. A designation pursuant to this subdivision shall not alter any license privileges or restrictions
 otherwise established by this section.

(2) An on-sale general license for special use issued pursuant this section shall be excluded from the number of on-sale general licenses available under Sections 23816 and 23821.

(d) A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the fee paid by the seller or transferor under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(e) For purposes of this section, “brewpub-restaurant license” means a license described in Section 23396.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 375, Sec. 4.   (AB 1704)   Effective October 7, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

24072.5.

Any person who has any on-sale general license may exchange his or her license for a special on-sale general license and any person who has a special on-sale general license may exchange his or her license for an on-sale general license. The exchange may be made at any time upon the approval of the department, the payment of an exchange fee of one hundred dollars ($100), and compliance with the provisions of this division relating to the issuance of an original license. However, Sections 23985, 23985.5, and 23986 shall not apply to the exchange of an on-sale general license for a special on-sale general license. All money collected from the fee provided for in this section shall be deposited in the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund as provided in Section 25761.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 900, Sec. 16.   Effective September 24, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

24073.
